Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.075

Shares—Consideration, fixing.

(1) Shares having a par value may be issued for such consideration expressed in dollars, not less than the par value thereof, as shall be fixed from time to time by the board of directors.

(2) Shares without par value shall be issued for such consideration expressed in dollars as may be fixed from time to time by the board of directors.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 15.]